New York, session 2025-2026, S9450.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 11-0901 of the environmental 2 conservation law is amended by adding a new paragraph b-1 to read as 3 follows: 4 b-1. (1) No person shall hunt leucistic deer, including white deer and 5 albino deer, or melanistic deer. 6 (2) The prohibition contained in subparagraph one of this paragraph 7 shall not apply to: the owner or lessee of the dwelling house, or 8 members of such owner's or lessee's immediate family residing therein, 9 or a person in their employ, or the guest of the owner or lessee of the 10 dwelling house acting with the consent of such owner or lessee. 11 (3) For the purpose of this paragraph, the following terms shall have 12 the following meanings: 13 (i) "leucistic deer" shall mean any deer displaying the recessive 14 genetic trait of leucism, or the absence of melanin pigment, causing the 15 deer's coat to be white in color on all parts of the body, excluding the 16 tarsal glands, head, or parts of the head; and 17 (ii) "melanistic deer" shall mean any deer displaying the genetic 18 mutation of melanism, causing the deer's coat to be black or dark brown 19 in color on all parts of the body, excluding the tarsal glands, head, or 20 parts of the head. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14099-01-5